Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2004.03
Investigation Petty Cash Fund; authorized.

The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety may apply to the Director of Administrative Services and the Auditor of Public Accounts to establish and maintain an Investigation Petty Cash Fund. The funds used to initiate and maintain the Investigation Petty Cash Fund shall be drawn solely from the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund. The superintendent shall determine the amount of money to be held in the Investigation Petty Cash Fund, consistent with carrying out the duties and responsibilities of section 81-2004.02, but not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars for the entire agency. This restriction shall not apply to General Funds that have been specifically appropriated to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund for investigative purposes. When the Director of Administrative Services and the Auditor of Public Accounts have approved the establishment of such fund, a voucher shall be submitted to the Department of Administrative Services accompanied by such information as the department may require for the establishment of the fund. The Director of Administrative Services shall issue a warrant for the amount specified and deliver it to the Nebraska State Patrol. Such fund may be replenished as necessary. The Investigation Petty Cash Fund shall be audited by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

Laws 1986, LB 851, § 2.